Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.150

Sewerage and refuse collection and disposal systems.

The general law as contained in, but not limited to, chapter 35.67 RCW, relating to sewerage systems and the collection and disposal of refuse, the manner of providing therefor, and the issuance of general obligation or revenue bonds therefor, the establishment of a revenue bond fund in connection therewith, compulsory connection with a city sewer system, setting and collection of rates, fees, and charges therefor, and the existence, enforcement, and foreclosure of a lien for sewer services is hereby recognized as applicable to code cities operating systems of sewerage and systems and plants for refuse collection and disposal. A code city may exercise the powers, in the manner provided, perform the duties, and shall have the rights and obligations provided in chapter 35.67 RCW, subject to the conditions and limitations therein provided.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.21.150.]